Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.450

Gender equity—Intent.

The legislature finds that the ratio of women to men in intercollegiate athletics in Washington's higher education system is inequitable. It is the intent of the legislature, through additional tuition and fee waivers, to achieve gender equity in intercollegiate athletics.

[ 1989 c 340 s 1.]